Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 350 Surface Coal Mining
350.130.
Notice of noncompliance — Revocation of permit — Bond forfeiture — Ineligibility for future permits — Notice or order effective upon delivery.

When any of the requirements of this chapter or administrative regulations adopted pursuant thereto or the orders of the cabinet have not been complied with, the cabinet shall forthwith cause a notice of noncompliance to be issued upon the permittee, person, or operator. The cabinet shall set forth in its notice a reasonable time period but not more than ninety (90) days for the abatement of the violation. If any permittee, person, or operator has not abated the violation within the time prescribed in the notice of noncompliance, the secretary or other authorized personnel of the cabinet shall issue to the permittee, operator, or person an order for immediate compliance and cessation of any mining activities or operations which are contributing to the violation. The order shall require the permittee, person, or operator to abate the violation in the most expeditious manner possible. The secretary is authorized to promulgate reasonable administrative regulations for the implementation of this section. The notice or order shall be handed to the person in charge of the operation and the operator or person engaged in coal exploration operations or sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the permanent address shown on the application for a permit; or by electronic mail to the address shown on the permit application or otherwise voluntarily provided to the cabinet by the permittee on a form prepared by the cabinet; or, if no address is shown on the application, then by certified or electronic mail to the address known to the cabinet. The notice of noncompliance or order for immediate compliance and cessation shall specify in what respects the permittee, person, or operator has failed to comply with this chapter or the regulations or orders of the cabinet and the remedial action required, the period of time established for abatement, and a reasonable description of the portion of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation to which the notice or order applies. If the permittee, person, or operator has not reached an agreement with the cabinet or has not complied with the requirements set forth in the notice of noncompliance or order for immediate compliance and cessation within time limits set therein, the permit may be revoked or the operation terminated, after an opportunity for a hearing, by order of the cabinet, and the performance bond, if any, shall then be forfeited to the cabinet, provided that failure to attend a hearing shall be excused for good cause shown. Any bonding company or financial institution providing bond to the cabinet shall have the right to perform those measures necessary to secure bond releases if the bonding company or financial institution can demonstrate that it has the ability to perform the measures and will undertake to do so within a reasonable time frame. The bonding company, or financial institution providing the bond, may, at any stage of the reclamation process, pay the remaining encumbered balance of the bond and thereby discharge its obligation under the bond. Neither the surety company nor the financial institution may employ anyone to perform the measures who has been barred from mining pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

When a bond is forfeited consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the cabinet shall forfeit the entire amount of the bond for the permit area or increment.

A permittee, operator, or person whose mining permit or operation has been revoked, suspended, or terminated or is at the time of the application in violation of this chapter or other applicable requirements as set forth in KRS

350.085

shall not be eligible to receive another permit or begin another operation or to have suspended permits or operations reinstated until he shall have complied with all the requirements of this chapter or submitted proof satisfactory to the cabinet under KRS

350.085

that the violation has been corrected or is in the process of being corrected in respect to all permits issued him, provided, further, that no permittee, operator, or person shall be eligible to receive another permit or begin another operation who has forfeited any bond unless the land for which the bond was forfeited has been reclaimed without cost to the state or the permittee, operator, or person has paid such sum as the cabinet finds is adequate to reclaim the lands. The cabinet shall not issue any permits to or allow future operations by any permittee, operator, or person who has demonstrated a pattern of willful violations of this chapter of such nature and duration with such resulting irreparable damage to the environment as to indicate an intent not to comply with the provisions of this chapter, provided that no permit shall be denied on this basis without an opportunity for a hearing. The secretary shall promulgate regulations which implement this section. For the purposes of this section, if a corporate permittee has demonstrated a pattern of willful violations, then any subsequent application for a permit by that corporation, or any person who controls or has controlled that corporation, shall be denied.

In the exercise of the secretary’s enforcement powers and authority under this chapter, the secretary, or an authorized representative of the cabinet, after inspection, shall immediately order the cessation of the condition or operation when he determines that the condition or operation creates an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public or that the condition or operation is causing or can reasonably be expected to cause significant imminent environmental harm in violation of this chapter or the regulations pursuant to this chapter, or any permit condition. For purposes of this subsection, “imminent danger to the health and safety of the public” means the existence of any condition or practice, or any violation of a permit or other requirement of this chapter in a surface coal mining and reclamation operation, which condition, practice, or violation could reasonably be expected to cause substantial physical harm to persons outside the permit area before the condition, practice, or violation can be abated. A reasonable expectation of death or serious injury before abatement exists if a rational person, subjected to the same conditions or practices giving rise to the peril, would not expose himself or herself to the danger during the time necessary for abatement.

Each provision of this section shall be interpreted and applied consistently with due process of law.

The secretary, or authorized representatives of the cabinet, shall have the power to vacate, amend, modify, or terminate notices of noncompliance and cessation orders, pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

Service of any notice or order by electronic mail shall be effective upon delivery of the notice or the order to the recipient’s inbox by electronic mail as electronically communicated to the cabinet by an electronic registered receipt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 13; 1962, ch. 105, § 10; 1964, ch. 61, § 7; 1966, ch. 4, § 19; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 72; 1974, ch. 69, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1974, ch. 315, § 75; 1974, ch. 399, § 2; 1978, ch. 105, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 330, § 20, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 99, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 62, § 14, effective March 21, 1980; 1980, ch. 377, § 11, effective March 21, 1980; 1982, ch. 283, § 6, effective April 2, 1982; 1988, ch. 294, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 210, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 429, § 17, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 114, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

350.131.
Use of forfeited reclamation bond funds — Contract to reclaim overlapped disturbed area for which bond has been forfeited and collected.

When a bond for an interim or preinterim program permit was forfeited prior to July 15, 1988, by the cabinet, and the entire forfeited amount is not necessary to establish proper drainage and revegetation on the permit area for which it was submitted, the cabinet may use any remaining funds to supplement reclamation of other forfeited or released permit areas, if the other permit areas endanger public health and safety.

When the bond for an interim or permanent program permit is forfeited by the cabinet, and the entire forfeited amount is more than the amount necessary to complete reclamation, the unused funds less any interest that has accrued shall be returned to the party from whom they were collected, subject to the cabinet’s right to attach or set off the proceeds under other state laws.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or the provisions of KRS Chapter 45A, when the bond, other than a surety bond or bond secured by a letter of credit, for an interim or permanent program permit is forfeited and collected by the cabinet, and a person subsequently applies for a permit overlapping all or part of the disturbed area of the permit area for which the bond is forfeited, the cabinet may negotiate and enter into a contract with the applicant to reclaim the disturbed area overlapped in exchange for all or part of the forfeited bond funds held by the cabinet, if requested by the applicant. If the applicant proposes to overlap only a part of the disturbed area the cabinet may enter into a contract with the applicant to reclaim the overlapped part of the disturbed area if the cabinet has retained a portion of the forfeited bond that is sufficient for the cabinet to reclaim the part of the disturbed area that is not overlapped. Any applicant under this subsection shall not be eligible for the benefits available under this subsection if the applicant has any ownership or control connection with the permittee or operator with respect to which the bond was forfeited. The amount of forfeited bond funds the cabinet may pay to the applicant shall be determined by the cabinet based upon the estimated cost for the cabinet to reclaim the disturbed area overlapped to the reclamation standards applicable to the original permit, but not to exceed the forfeited bond amount collected and held by the cabinet. Payments under this subsection shall be made only after release of the bond pursuant to KRS 350.093(4)(a) for those areas of the overlapping permit that are covered by the contract. If the applicant obtains a permanent program permit overlapping a forfeited interim permit, any disturbances created in connection with the overlapping permit on areas that were disturbed under the forfeited interim permit may be covered by a contract under this subsection and shall be reclaimed to permanent program standards. Areas where coal is not removed under the overlapping permit and the disturbances are for reclamation of the interim permit only shall be reclaimed to interim program standards. If the applicant obtains a permanent program permit overlapping a forfeited interim permit, any disturbances created in connection with the overlapping permit on areas that were not disturbed under the forfeited interim permit shall not be covered by a contract under this subsection and shall be reclaimed to permanent program standards. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to exempt a person from the permitting, bonding, and reclamation requirements imposed in this chapter or to infringe upon the right of any surety to reclaim any permit or increment thereof to avoid bond forfeiture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 451, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 294, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 222, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

350.133.
Mountaintop removal.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the mountaintop removal method of strip mining coal under the conditions set forth in this chapter or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 399, § 3; 1978, ch. 330, § 21, effective May 3, 1978.

350.135.
Requirements for transfer of surface coal mining permit — Release of bond — Regulations — Approval by cabinet.

No surface coal mining permit issued pursuant to this chapter shall be transferred by sale, assignment, lease, or otherwise except upon the written approval by the cabinet of a joint application submitted by both the transferor and the transferee. A basic fee set by regulation, and bearing a reasonable relationship to the cost of processing the transfer, but not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) shall accompany the application and no acreage fee will be assessed. The transferee shall file with the application a bond satisfactory to the cabinet which shall ensure reclamation of the entire area of land affected under the permit, including areas previously affected by the transferor. All rights and liabilities under the permit shall pass to the transferee upon written approval of the transfer by the cabinet, except that the transferor shall remain liable for any civil penalties resulting from violations occurring prior to the date of approval of the transfer. The cabinet shall not approve transfer of a surface coal mining permit to any person who would be ineligible to receive a new permit under this chapter.

After the cabinet has given its written approval to the transfer, the transferee may conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations according to the approved mining and reclamation plan of the original permittee. Any transferee seeking to change the conditions of mining or reclamation operations, or any of the terms or conditions of the original permit, shall apply for a new or revised permit pursuant to the requirements of the cabinet.

The cabinet shall not release the first permittee from bond liability under this chapter as to that particular operation until the transferee, having filed a bond satisfactory to the cabinet, receives written approval from the cabinet for the transfer, and otherwise complies with the requirements of this chapter, and provided further that the transferee shall assume as part of his obligation under this chapter, all liability for the reclamation of the area of land affected by the former permittee.

The cabinet may promulgate reasonable regulations and administrative procedures to implement this section.

The cabinet shall approve the transfer application if:

A joint agreement or sale has been executed;

The transferee has posted bond satisfactory to the cabinet which insures reclamation of the entire area of land affected under the permit;

The transferee has paid the fee pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

The transferee has agreed to operate under provisions of the approved permit being transferred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 105, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1978, ch. 330, § 27, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 15; 1984, ch. 392, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 429, § 18, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 103, § 3, effective April 8, 2010.

350.139.
Deposit of funds to State Treasury — Exceptions — Amount to be transferred to fiscal courts — Remainder for Division of Mine Permits.

All prior enactments of this General Assembly to the contrary notwithstanding, all funds received by the Energy and Environment Cabinet through the payment of fees and civil penalties shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the general fund, except those fees established in KRS 350.060(11) and (13), 350.070(2) and (4), 350.135(1), and as provided in KRS 350.990(1). All funds from the forfeiture of bonds shall be placed in the State Treasury in an interest-bearing account and credited to a special agency account. The interest shall become a supplemental fund and may be used to supplement forfeited bonds which are inadequate to complete the reclamation plan. Except as provided in KRS 350.131(1), forfeited bond funds shall be expended upon the lands for which the bond was given. The interest may be expended upon lands other than those for which the bond was given. No more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the supplemental fund may be expended upon any single site, unless a larger expenditure is necessary to abate an imminent danger to public health or safety.

Subject to the limitation in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the Department for Natural Resources shall, on or before August 1 of each year, transfer to the fiscal court of the county in which the permitted operation is located, an amount equal to thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) of all funds paid during the preceding fiscal year as fees for the issuance of any permit for surface coal mining operations for the general purposes of that fiscal court.

The department shall calculate the amount to be transferred each year under this subsection as if the fee rates in effect pursuant to this chapter on October 1, 2009, were still in effect during the preceding fiscal year.

Except for the amount of fees paid to fiscal courts pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, all permit and acreage fees established in KRS 350.060(11) and (13), 350.070(2) and (4), and 350.135(1) shall be held specifically for the use of the Division of Mine Permits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 81; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2), (7); 1980, ch. 377, § 4; 1982, ch. 409, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 210, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 222, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 1879, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 103, § 4, effective April 8, 2010.

350.140.
Strip mining and reclamation fund. [Repealed.]

350.141.
Disposition of funds derived from fees and forfeiture of bonds; lapse of trust and agency accounts; fund for financing grant-in-aid projects. [Repealed.]

350.143.
State treasurer to annually transfer funds to fiscal court. [Repealed.]

350.145.
Use of transferred funds by fiscal court. [Repealed.]

350.150.
Reclamation work by cabinet — Procedure — Acceptance of federal and other funds — Access to land.

In the reclamation of land affected by surface coal mining operations for which it has funds available, the cabinet may avail itself of any services which may be provided by other state agencies or by agencies of the federal government, and may compensate them for the services. The cabinet may also receive any federal funds, state funds, or any other funds for the reclamation of land affected by surface coal mining operations. The cabinet may cause the reclamation work to be done by its own employees or by employees of other governmental agencies, soil conservation districts, or through contracts with qualified persons. The contracts, other than negotiated contracts awarded pursuant to KRS 350.131(3), shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder upon competitive bids after reasonable advertisement. The cabinet and any other agency and any contractor under a contract with the cabinet shall have the right of access to the land affected to carry out the reclamation.

Any funds available to the cabinet and any public works program (both funds and services) may be used and expended to reclaim and rehabilitate any lands that have been subjected to surface coal mining operations that have not been reclaimed and rehabilitated in accordance with standards set by this chapter or administrative regulations thereunder and which are not covered by bond to guarantee the reclamation.

A person or organization, having qualifications acceptable to the cabinet, may post bond or a cash deposit, in a sum determined by the cabinet, and assume the liability for carrying out the reclamation plan approved by the cabinet in areas where the mining operation and any necessary grading and backfilling have been completed. The cabinet shall then release the bond posted by the permittee for the area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 15; 1962, ch. 105, § 12; 1964, ch. 61, § 8; 1966, ch. 4, § 20; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 73; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1978, ch. 332, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 16; 1992, ch. 429, § 19, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 323, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

350.151.
Permanent program administrative regulations for mining and reclamation — Bond.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall promulgate permanent program administrative regulations for the mining and reclamation of land disturbed or removed by operations resulting from or incident to underground coal mining. The regulations shall recognize the distinct differences between underground mining and strip mining of coal, shall be promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and shall be enforced as provided in KRS

350.130

and

350.990

. Those activities may include but not be limited to the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of the activities and all lands affected by haulage, excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface, but the regulations shall not be more stringent than those applied to strip mining of coal.

The permit applicant shall file with the cabinet a reclamation bond payable to the Commonwealth of Kentucky with surety satisfactory to the cabinet in the sum to be determined by the cabinet for each acre or fraction thereof of the area of land affected, with a minimum bond of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) conditioned upon the faithful performance of the requirements set forth in this section and of the administrative regulations of the cabinet. The cabinet shall forfeit the entire amount of the bond for the permit area or increment in the event of forfeiture. The cabinet shall accept, in lieu of the surety provided in this subsection, the deposit by the operator of United States government securities, cash or its equivalent in a sum equal to the principal amount of the required bond, or a self-bond pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

In order to protect the stability of the land, the cabinet shall suspend underground mining activities under urbanized areas, and adjacent to industrial or commercial buildings, major impoundments, or permanent streams, if the cabinet finds imminent danger to inhabitants of the urbanized areas.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 256, § 1; 1976, ch. 291, § 3; 1978, ch. 330, § 22, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 17; 1988, ch. 417, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 210, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 429, § 20, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 24, § 1880, effective July 15, 2010.

350.152.
Acquisition of land by Commonwealth for reclamation purposes.

The Commonwealth, acting by and through its Energy and Environment Cabinet, shall have the power to acquire, either by negotiation or by exercise of the power of eminent domain, land which has been affected or disturbed by strip or auger mining, or by other surface coal mining operations which consists of orphan banks or unreclaimed spoil piles.

Prior to acquiring any land pursuant to KRS

350.152

to

350.163

and KRS

350.240

, the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall extend to the owners thereof an opportunity to backfill, grade, plant, and do other acts of restoration thereon to the same extent and within the same time limits as prescribed by this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. If the owner or owners agree in writing to perform such restoration and, weather permitting, start such restoration within a period of thirty (30) days, the land shall not be acquired by the Commonwealth.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall attempt to purchase any land which it has determined should be acquired for the purpose of restoration and which the owners have not agreed to restore as provided in subsection (2) above. In any case where the cabinet and the owners of the land are unable to agree upon the amount to be paid for the land, the cabinet may exercise the power of eminent domain against such land by filing a condemnation suit under the procedure of the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

The purchase price, in the case of a negotiated acquisition, or the damages as finally determined, in the case of acquisition by condemnation, and the necessary expenses incidental thereto, shall be paid from appropriations made by the General Assembly for such purposes and appropriations to which federal funds made available for such purposes have been credited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 32; 1972, ch. 359, § 1; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 74; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2); 1976, ch. 140, § 117; 1980, ch. 377, § 5; 2010, ch. 24, § 1881, effective July 15, 2010.

350.154.
Restoration and reclamation by cabinet.

The cabinet shall have the power to backfill, grade, plant and perform other acts of restoration and reclamation, or contract for the performance of such restoration work, on any lands acquired under KRS

350.152

to

350.163

and

350.240

, to the extent and subject to such conditions as state or federal funds are appropriated and available therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 33; 1978, ch. 332, § 8, effective June 17, 1978.

350.156.
Transfer of jurisdiction of restored land to state agency or sale to political subdivision — Return of money to revolving fund.

After restoration of the acquired land, the cabinet may, with the approval of the Governor, transfer jurisdiction of such land, or any portion thereof, to any state agency that can best utilize such land for public purposes.

If the retention of such land is determined to be impractical, the cabinet may, with the approval of the Governor, sell such land to political subdivisions of the Commonwealth at the cost of acquisition and restoration or public sale to the highest bidder. Such land shall be sold subject to the condition that no surface coal mining shall be carried on thereon at any time thereafter. The proceeds of any such sale shall be credited to a revolving fund within the cabinet.

Whenever the cabinet expends funds pursuant to this section in order to satisfy the total purchase price for lands purchased pursuant to KRS

350.570

, the cabinet may return to the revolving fund any moneys so used upon resale or other transfer of such land.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 34; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 75; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2); 1980, ch. 62, § 27.

350.158.
Land under bond for restoration not to be acquired.

No land, with respect to which a bond conditioned upon the restoration thereof is in effect, shall be acquired pursuant to the provisions of KRS

350.152

to

350.163

and

350.240

, nor shall this chapter be construed to relieve any person from any obligation to backfill, grade, plant or perform other restoration and reclamation required by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 35.

350.160.
Review of department’s action; appeals. [Repealed.]

350.161.
Acquisition and disposal of land, how governed.

All acquisitions and disposals of land or any interests therein pursuant to the authority granted by KRS

350.152

to

350.163

and

350.240

shall be governed by the applicable provisions of KRS Chapters 45 and 56.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 36.

350.163.
Cabinet may accept state and federal funds — Deposit in State Treasury.

The cabinet is authorized and empowered to receive and accept from the Commonwealth or any of its agencies and from federal agencies, appropriations or grants to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, and to receive and accept aid or contributions from any source of either money, property, labor or any other things of value, to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

All funds available or paid to the cabinet under this chapter shall be placed in the State Treasury and credited pursuant to the terms of the appropriation, grant, aid or contribution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 37; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 76; 1978, ch. 332, § 9, effective June 17, 1978.

350.170.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall not be construed as repealing any of the laws of the Commonwealth relating to the pollution of the waters thereof, any conservation or mining laws, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 19; 1966, ch. 4, § 21.

350.175.
Persons required to comply with requirements of chapter.

Any agency, unit, or instrumentality of federal, state, or local government, including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation of federal, state, or local government, which proposes to engage in surface coal mining operations, as defined by KRS 350.010(1), shall comply with the requirements of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 62, § 38.

350.180.
Advisory committee on strip mining and reclamation. [Repealed.]

350.185.
Advisory committees. [Repealed.]

350.190.
Application of KRS 350.010, 350.024, 350.026, 350.060, 350.090, and 350.990. [Repealed.]

350.195.
Chapter not applicable to mining of ball clay. [Repealed.]

350.200.
Signs to be posted at mining sites.

All surface coal mining operations operating under a permit from the cabinet shall display appropriate signs at the entrances, clearly setting forth the name, business address, phone number of the permittee and the permit number of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations, as required by regulations of the cabinet. Such signs shall be maintained during the life of the operation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 13; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1980, ch. 62, § 28.

350.210.
Monuments marking permit areas. [Repealed.]

350.220.
Regulation of use of explosives. [Repealed.]

350.230.
Conformance to statutes and regulations required, when — Effective date of regulation.

Irrespective of date of issuance of a permit, all permittees, operators, and persons shall immediately conform to any statutes enacted or regulations adopted on the effective date of the statute or regulation. This section shall not require the regrading or replanting of any area on which the work was satisfactorily performed prior to the effective date of the statute or regulation. The cabinet shall specify for every regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter the effective date of such regulation. However, the cabinet may specify a reasonable period of time in which permittees, persons, and operators shall conform to any regulations adopted when it finds that such conformance time is reasonably necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 26; 1980, ch. 377, § 9; 1992, ch. 429, § 21, effective July 14, 1992.

350.240.
Clay mining regulations.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet may adopt reasonable regulations for the reclamation of land disturbed or removed in the mining of clay. Such regulations shall encourage water impoundments and shall follow the standards established in Article III of the Interstate Mining Compact. The cabinet shall have the authority to adopt such regulations prior to the effective date of the Interstate Mining Compact and irrespective of whether the state becomes a member or withdraws from membership in the Interstate Mining Compact.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 38; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 78; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(2); 2010, ch. 24, § 1882, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 44, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/11/91). A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS

7.136

and

7.140

.

350.245.
Permit required to conduct mining for vein minerals — Exemptions.

A person shall not conduct mining for limestone, dolomite, sand, gravel, clay, fluorspar, or other vein minerals without first obtaining a permit from the cabinet. However, no permit shall be required for the excavation of limestone, dolomite, sand, gravel, clay, fluorspar, or other vein minerals by a landowner for personal, noncommercial use if:

Fifty (50) tons or less are excavated in twelve (12) successive calendar months;

They are excavated from land owned by the landowner; and

They are used only on the property owned by the landowner, as provided in Article II(a) of KRS

350.300

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 85, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

350.250.
Complaints of violation — Mandamus — Civil action by person adversely affected by violation — Intervention by cabinet.

Any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected having knowledge that any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted thereunder are not being enforced by any public officer or employee, whose duty it is to enforce such provisions of this chapter and regulations thereunder, may bring such failure to enforce the law to the attention of such public officer or employee. To provide against unreasonable and irresponsible demands being made, all such demands to enforce the law must be in writing, under oath, with facts set forth specifically stating the nature of the failure to enforce the law. If such public officer or employee neglects or refuses for any unreasonable time but in no event longer than sixty (60) days after demand to enforce such provision, any such person shall have the right to bring an action of mandamus in the Circuit Court of the county in which the operation which relates to the alleged lack of enforcement is being conducted; provided, that any action pursuant to this section may be brought immediately after a demand for enforcement when the violation or order complained of constitutes an imminent threat to the health or safety of the complaining person or would immediately affect a legal interest of the complaining person. The court, if satisfied that any provision of this chapter or regulation thereunder is not being enforced, shall make an appropriate order compelling the public officer or employee, whose duty it is to enforce such provision, to perform his duties, and upon failure to do so such public officer or employee shall be held in contempt of court and shall be subject to the penalties provided by the laws of the Commonwealth in such cases.

The court having jurisdiction of a complaint made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may in its final order award costs of litigation (including attorney and expert witness fees) to any party, whenever the court determines such an award is appropriate.

Any person who is or may be adversely affected by the violation by any person of any rule, regulation, order or permit issued pursuant to this chapter may bring a civil action for injunctive relief or for damages or both (including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees) in the Circuit Court of the county in which the surface coal mining operation complained of is located. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by the Commonwealth.

In such action under this section, the cabinet, if not a party, may intervene as a matter of right.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 23; 1978, ch. 332, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 29; 1984, ch. 145, § 4, effective March 28, 1984.

350.255.
Petition for initiation of proceeding for issuance, amendment or repeal of a regulation — Notice — Hearing — Order — Judicial review.

Any person may petition the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet to initiate a proceeding for the issuance, amendment, or repeal of any regulation under this chapter.

Notice and an opportunity shall be provided for the petitioner and any person wishing to participate to be heard at a public hearing within thirty (30) days following the filing of the petition on the facts, technical justification, and law alleged in the petition.

The secretary shall render a final order in writing within thirty (30) days after the hearing granting or denying the petition on grounds that there is a reasonable basis for the petitioned rule change, or is not, or that it is required or prohibited by law and setting forth the reasons for the decision.

The secretary shall initiate a rulemaking proceeding pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A within thirty (30) days after a petition is granted proposing the issuance, amendment, or repeal of the petitioned regulations in conformity with the final order.

Any participant in the petition proceedings may seek review in the Circuit Court of Franklin County of a final order of the secretary denying all or any portion of the action requested in a petition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 209, § 3; 1980, ch. 377, § 7; 1992, ch. 304, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 429, § 22, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 178, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 24, § 1883, effective July 15, 2010.

350.260.
Small Coal Operators Advisory Council. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 328, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 325, § 32, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 194, § 64, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 123, § 53, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 1884 , effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Acts 1984, ch. 328, § 1, effective July 13, 1984;
1990, ch. 325, § 32, effective July 13, 1990;
1992, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 14, 1992;
1996, ch. 194, § 64, effective July 15, 1996;
2005, ch. 123, § 53; effective June 20, 2005;
2010, ch. 24, § 1884, effective July 15, 2010) was repealed by
2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective March 27, 2017.